trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.ca.dix
<pardef n="adscri/ure__vblex">
      
  <e>       <p><l>uríem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uríeu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uries</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urien</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uria</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uré</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ureu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uràs</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>uran</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>urà</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
     
  <e>       <p><l>vint</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vint</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guérem</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vírem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guí</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ví</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéreu</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>víreu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueres</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vires</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueren</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>viren</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gué</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ví</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>viu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>viu</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aneu"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__aclareix"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guin</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guen</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>guin</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guen</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__anant"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>gui</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ga</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ure</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__vagi"/></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víem</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víeu</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vies</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vien</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>via</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víssim</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéssim</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>guérem</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vírem</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vís</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>gués</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guera</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vira</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>víssiu</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéssiu</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guéreu</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>víreu</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vissis</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>guessis</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueres</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vires</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vissin</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>guessin</l>   <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gueren</l>    <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>viren</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>vís</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
       
  <e r="LR"><p><l>gués</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>guera</l>     <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e r="LR"><p><l>vira</l>      <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      
  <e>       <p><l>ta</l>        <r>ure<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      

<e lm="descriure">       <i>descri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inscriure">       <i>inscri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escriure">        <i>escri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prescriure">      <i>prescri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sotaescriure">    <i>sotaescri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="subscriure">      <i>subscri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="transcriure">     <i>transcri</i><par n="adscri/ure__vblex"/></e>
